dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX xB 0 àvemi/I6 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àemi/I6 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àvetu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àetu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àveu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB 0 àeu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er émoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + (g)avémo
SFX xB er ímoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + avímo
SFX xB r a [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB r e-l/J5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB r e-ƚo/j5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB er ével/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB ver éel/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB ver éa [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB ver ée-l/J5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB ver ée-ƚo/j5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB er éel/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xB r ndo [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB r ndo-l/P1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB r ndo-ƚo/P2 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB er éndogel/P4A1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB er éndogeƚo/P5 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xB r nde [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xB r nde-l/P1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xB r nde-ƚo/P2 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xB er éndegel/P4A1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xB er éndegeƚo/P5 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xB r nto [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB r nto-l/P1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB r nto-ƚo/P2 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB er éntogel/P4A1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB er èntogel/P4A1 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB 0 àl/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB 0 àƚo/i5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB er è [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xB er é [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xB er ègel/R4A1 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + è
SFX xB er égel/R4A1 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + é
SFX xB er í [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xB er í-l/R1 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T5
SFX xB er í-ƚo/R2 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T5
SFX xB er ígel/R4A1 [aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xB er éntogeƚo/P5 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB er èntogeƚo/P5 [aʼ]ver	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xB er ègeƚo/R5A1	[aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + è
SFX xB er égeƚo/R5A1	[aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = T12 + é
SFX xB er ígeƚo/R5A1	[aʼ]ver	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xB er évemi/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)e
SFX xB er éemi/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)e
SFX xB er évatu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a, 2s=3
SFX xB aver évatu/j3I3 aver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a, 2s=3
SFX xB er éatu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a, 2s=3
SFX xB aver éatu/j3I3 aver	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a, 2s=3
SFX xB 0 óni/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rón
SFX xB 0 éni/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rén
SFX xB er arémoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xB er arímoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xB er aràƚo/i5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver ràƚo/i5 aver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB er aràl/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver ràl/I5 aver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver eróni/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rón
SFX xB ver eréni/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rén
SFX xB ver arémoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xB ver arímoi/I2 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xB ver arà [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver arà-l/J5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver arà-ƚo/j5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver aràl/I5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB ver aràƚo/i5 [aʼ]ver	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xB er aràemi/I1 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràvemi/I6 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràemi/I6 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràvetu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràetu/j3I3 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràveu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràeu/I4 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràe/J1 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràe/J6 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràe/J3 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xB er aràe/J4 [aʼ]ver	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e


# vèrbi -ér inregolari: (re)aver
SFX xC Y 8
SFX xC aver vepion aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xC aver vepione aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + (i)ón(e)
SFX xC aver vepien aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xC aver vepiene aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én(e)
SFX xC aver vepié aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é([dg]e) = T5
SFX xC aver vepie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xC aver vepie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+singular	# T8 + e, 2s=3
SFX xC aver vepie aver	ds:subjunctive+present is:third	# T8 + a
